bg-BG: Характеристики на дизайна за достъпност: Слушалка с усилвател; Големи бутони; Изключително силен звънец; Клавиши за бързо набиране на снимки; Бутон за SOS при спешни случаи; Забавено възпроизвеждане на реч; Говорещ идентификатор на повикващия; Контрол на тона; Сигнал за вибрации; Визуален индикатор с пръстен; Други
fr: Caractéristiques d’accessibilité: Écouteur amplifié; Gros boutons; Sonnerie extra forte; Touches de raccourci photo; Bouton d'urgence SOS; Lecture vocale lente; Identification vocale de l'appelant; Contrôle de tonalité; Alerte par vibration; Indicateur de sonnerie visuelle; Autre
sv: Funktioner för tillgänglighetsdesign: Hörselförstärkare; Stora knappar; Extra hög ringsignal; Fotoknappar för snabbval; SOS-nödknapp; Långsam taluppspelning; Talande nummerpresentatör; Tonreglering; Vibrationsläge; Visuell ringindikator; Övrigt
nb: Tilgjengelighetsdesignfunksjoner: Forsterket ørepropp; Store knapper; Ekstra høy ringetone; Hurtigvalgstaster med bilde; SOS-nødknapp; Langsom avspilling av tale; Talende nummerpresentasjon; Tonekontroll; Vibrasjonsvarsel; Visuell ringeindikator; Annet
nl: Toegankelijkheidsontwerpfuncties: Versterkte oortelefoon; Grote knoppen; Extra luide beltoon; Foto-snelkiestoetsen; SOS-noodknop; Spraak langzaam afspelen; Pratende beller-ID; Toonregeling; Trilmodus; Visuele ringindicator; Andere
zh-TW: 無障礙設計功能: 擴音耳塞式耳機; 大按鈕; 超大鈴聲; 照片快撥鍵; 緊急求救按鈕; 慢速語音播放; 語音來電顯示; 音色控制; 振動警示; 視覺化響鈴指示器; 其他
pl: Cechy konstrukcyjne dotyczące dostępności: Wzmocniona słuchawka; Duże przyciski; Bardzo głośny dzwonek; Przyciski szybkiego wybierania ze zdjęciami; Przycisk alarmowy SOS; Odtwarzanie mowy w zwolnionym tempie; Identyfikator rozmówcy; Regulacja tonu; Alarm wibracyjny; Optyczny wskaźnik dzwonka; Inne
sk-SK: Prístupové dizajnové prvky: Zosilnené slúchadlo; Veľké tlačidlá; Extra hlasné zvonenie; Tlačidlá rýchlej voľby s fotografiami; Núdzové tlačidlo SOS; Pomalé prehrávanie reči; Hlasová identifikácia volajúceho; Ovládanie tónov; Vibračné upozornenie; Vizuálny indikátor zvonenia; Iné
ja: アクセシビリティ設計機能: 増幅イヤーピース; 大きなボタン; 超大音量着信音; 写真スピードダイヤルキー; SOS緊急ボタン; ゆっくり再生; 音声発信者ID; トーンコントロール; 振動アラート; 視覚的なリングインジケーター; その他
th: คุณสมบัติการออกแบบเพื่อการเข้าถึง: หูฟังขยายเสียง; ปุ่มใหญ่ๆ; เสียงเรียกเข้าดังเป็นพิเศษ; ปุ่มโทรด่วนรูปถ่าย; ปุ่มฉุกเฉิน SOS; การเล่นคำพูดช้า; การพูดคุยแสดงหมายเลขผู้โทร; การควบคุมโทนเสียง; การแจ้งเตือนการสั่นสะเทือน; ตัวแสดงภาพแบบวงแหวน; อื่นๆ
tr: Erişilebilirlik tasarımı özellikleri: Ses yükselticili kulaklık; Büyük düğmeler; Ekstra yüksek sesli zil sesi; Fotoğrafla hızlı arama tuşları; SOS acil durum butonu; Yavaş hızla oynatma; Sesli arayan kimliği; Ton kontrolü; Titreşim uyarısı; Görsel halka göstergesi; Diğer
zh-CN: 无障碍设计功能: 扩音耳机; 大按键; 超响铃音; 照片快捷拨号键; 紧急求助按钮; 慢速语音播放; 语音来电显示; 音调控制; 震动提醒; 视觉铃声指示灯; 其他
pt-BR: Recursos de design de acessibilidade: Fone de ouvido amplificado; Botões grandes; Campainha extra alta; Teclas de discagem rápida de fotos; Botão de emergência SOS; Reprodução lenta da fala; Anunciador do originador da chamada; Controle de tom; Alerta de vibração; Indicador visual de toque; Outro
it: Funzionalità di design per l’accessibilità: Auricolare amplificato; Pulsanti grandi; Suoneria extra-forte; Tasti di selezione rapida delle foto; Pulsante di emergenza SOS; Riproduzione lenta del parlato; ID del chiamante parlante; Controllo del tono; Avviso di vibrazione; Indicatore visivo dell'anello; Altro
sl-SI: Funkcije oblikovanja za dostopnost: Ojačana slušalka; Veliki gumbi; Zelo glasna melodija zvonjenja; Tipke za hitro klicanje s fotografijami; Nujni gumb SOS; Počasno predvajanje govora; Govorno obveščanje o klicočem; Nadzor tonov; Opozorilo z vibriranjem; Vizualni indikator zvonjenja; Drugo
hu: Akadálymentesítési tervezési jellemzők: Erősített fülhallgató; Nagy gombok; Extra hangos csengőhang; Fényképes gyorshívó gombok; SOS vészhelyzeti gomb; Lassított beszéd lejátszása; Beszélő hívóazonosító; Hangszínszabályzás; Rezgőjelzés; Vizuális gyűrűjelző; Egyéb
fi: Esteettömyyden suunnitteluominaisuudet: Vahvistettu kuuloke; Isot painikkeet; Erittäin kova soittoääni; Valokuvan pikavalintanäppäimet; SOS-hätäpainike; Hidas puheen toisto; Puhuva soittajan tunnus; Ääniohjaus; Värinähälytys; Visuaalinen soiton ilmaisin; Muu
de: Zugänglichkeits-Designmerkmale: Verstärkter Ohrhörer; Große Schaltflächen; Extra lauter Klingelton; Foto-Kurzwahltasten; SOS-Notruftaste; Langsame Sprachwiedergabe; Sprechende Anruferkennung; Klangregelung; Vibrationsalarm; Visuelle Ringanzeige; Sonstiges
da: Funktioner til tilgængelighedsdesign: Forstærket øreprop; Store knapper; Ekstra høj ringetone; Foto-hurtigopkaldstaster; SOS-nødknap; Langsom taleafspilning; Talende opkalders ID; Tonekontrol; Vibrationsalarm; Visuel ringeindikator; Andet
hr-HR: Značajke dizajna pristupačnosti: Pojačana slušalica; Veliki gumbi; Iznimno glasno zvono; Prikaz tipki za brzo biranje na zaslonu; SOS tipka za hitne slučajeve; Usporena reprodukcija govora; Govorni ID pozivatelja; Upravljanje tonom; Upozorenje vibracijom; Vizualni indikator prstena; Ostalo
ko: 접근성 디자인 기능: 증폭된 이어피스; 큰 버튼; 매우 큰 벨소리; 사진 단축 다이얼 키; SOS 비상 버튼; 느린 음성 재생; 말하는 발신자 ID; 톤 관리; 진동 알림; 시각적 링 표시기; 기타
lt-LT: Prieinamumo dizaino ypatybės: Sustiprinta ausinė; Dideli mygtukai; Ypač garsus skambutis; Nuotraukų greitojo rinkimo klavišai; SOS pagalbos mygtukas; Lėtas kalbos atkūrimas; Pasakomas skambintojo ID; Tono valdymas; Vibravimo režimas; Vizualinis skambučio indikatorius; Kita
cs: Funkce pro usnadnění přístupu: Zesílené sluchátko; Velká tlačítka; Extra hlasité vyzvánění; Tlačítka pro rychlé vytáčení pomocí fotografií; Tísňové SOS tlačítko; Zpomalené přehrávání řeči; Hlasové oznámení volajícího; Ovládání tónu; Vibrační upozornění; Vizuální indikátor vyzvánění; Jiné
ro-RO: Caracteristici de design pentru accesibilitate: Căști cu amplificare; Butoane mari; Sonerie extra-puternică; Taste de apelare rapidă cu fotografie; Buton de urgență SOS; Redare lentă a vorbirii; Identificare vocală apelant; Controlul tonului; Alertă prin vibrații; Indicator vizual al inelului; Altele
el: Χαρακτηριστικά σχεδιασμού προσβασιμότητας: Ενισχυμένο ακουστικό; Μεγάλα κουμπιά; Εξαιρετικά δυνατό κουδούνισμα; Πλήκτρα γρήγορης κλήσης με φωτογραφία; Κουμπί έκτακτης ανάγκης SOS; Αργή αναπαραγωγή ομιλίας; Αναγνώριση καλούντος με ομιλία; Έλεγχος τόνου; Ειδοποίηση δόνησης; Οπτική ένδειξη κουδουνίσματος; Άλλο
ru: Характеристики дизайна доступности: Усиленный динамик наушника; Большие кнопки; Очень громкий звонок; Кнопки быстрого набора с фото; Кнопка экстренного вызова SOS; Замедленное воспроизведение речи; Определитель номера; Регулировка тембра; Виброзвонок; Визуальный индикатор звонка; Другое
vi: Các tính năng thiết kế trợ năng: Tai nghe khuếch đại; Nút lớn; Chuông siêu lớn; Phím gọi nhanh bằng hình ảnh; Nút khẩn cấp SOS; Phát lại giọng nói chậm; Đọc tên người gọi; Kiểm soát tần số âm thanh; Cảnh báo rung; Đèn báo chuông bằng hình ảnh; Khác
pt-PT: Caraterísticas de design de acessibilidade: Auricular com amplificação; Botões grandes; Toque extra alto; Teclas de marcação rápida para fotografias; Botão de emergência SOS; Reprodução lenta da fala; Identificação de chamadas por voz; Controlo por tom; Alerta por vibração; Indicador visual em forma de anel; Outro
es: Características del diseño de accesibilidad: Auricular amplificado; Botones grandes; Timbre extra fuerte; Teclas de marcación rápida de fotografías; Botón de emergencia SOS; Reproducción de voz lenta; Identificador de llamadas parlante; Control de tono; Alerta de vibración; Indicador de anillo visual; Otros
en: Accessibility design features: Amplified earpiece; Big buttons; Extra-loud ringer; Photo speed-dial keys; SOS emergency button; Slow speech playback; Talking caller ID; Tone control; Vibration alert; Visual ring indicator; Other